Missouri, session 2026, SB1073.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 9, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto
one new section, to be known as section 9.133, to read as
follows:
9.133. October fourteenth of each year shall be known
and designated as "Charlie Kirk Day" in Missouri. The
citizens of this state are encouraged to participate in
appropriate events and activities to honor the life of
Charlie Kirk, who was a champion of free speech, civil
dialogue, and faith.
✓